North Carolina, session 2025, HB1157.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-63. Registration plates furnished by Division; requirements; replacement of regular
plates with First in Flight plates, First in Freedom plates, or National/State
Mottos plates; surrender and reissuance; displaying; preservation and cleaning;
alteration or concealment of numbers; commission contracts for issuance.
…
(b1) The following special registration plates do not have to be a "First in Flight" plate,
"First in Freedom" plate, or "National/State Mottos" plate as provided in subsection (b) of this
*H1157-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
section. The design of the plates that are not "First in Flight" plates, "First in Freedom" plates, or
"National/State Mottos" plate must be developed in accordance with G.S. 20-79.4(a3). For
special plates authorized in G.S. 20-79.7 on or after July 1, 2013, the Division may not issue the
plate on a background under this subsection unless it receives the required number of applications
set forth in G.S. 20-79.3A(a).
…
() Red Wolf.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.4. Special registration plates.
…
(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() Red Wolf. – Issuable to the registered owner of a motor vehicle in accordance
with G.S. 20-81.12. The plate shall bear the phrase "Red Wolf" and an image
that depicts a red wolf. The plate authorized by this subdivision is not subject
to the provisions of G.S. 20-79.3A or G.S. 20-79.8.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-79.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.7. Fees for special registration plates and distribution of the fees.
…
(a1) Fees. – All other special registration plates are subject to the regular motor vehicle
registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the following amount:

Special Plate Additional Fee Amount
…
Red Drum Expired July 1, 2016
Red Wolf $30.00
Retired Legislator $30.00
…
(b) Distribution of Fees. – The Special Registration Plate Account and the Collegiate and
Cultural Attraction Plate Account are established within the Highway Fund. The Division must
credit the additional fee imposed for the special registration plates listed in subsection (a1) of this
section among the Special Registration Plate Account (SRPA), the Collegiate and Cultural
Attraction Plate Account (CCAPA), the North Carolina Land and Water Fund (NCLWF) which
is established under G.S. 143B-135.234, and the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, which is
established under G.S. 143B-135.56, as follows:

Special Plate SRPA CCAPA NCLWF PRTF
…
Professional Engineer – Expired
July 1, 2016
Red Wolf $10 $20 0 0
Retired Legislator $10 $20 0 0
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-81.12 is amended by adding the following new subsection to
read:
"() Red Wolf. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the Collegiate and
Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of Red Wolf plates to the North Carolina
Wildlife Resources Commission to be used for red wolf conservation, management, research,
monitoring, and habitat preservation and restoration."
Page 2 House Bill 1157-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-63(b1), 20-79.4(b) and 20-81.12 to
ensure that all of the special registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and numbered
accordingly.
SECTION 6. North Carolina State University, through the College of Veterinary
Medicine, shall actively promote the Red Wolf special registration plate on campus and through
appropriate university communications channels by, at a minimum, doing all of the following:
(1) Include information about the availability and purpose of the plate on an
appropriate University webpage.
(2) Promote the plate through student, alumni, faculty, staff, and athletics
communications, as appropriate.
(3) Coordinate, as appropriate, with the Division of Motor Vehicles and the North
Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission on messaging regarding the plate
and the conservation purpose for which plate proceeds are used.
(4) Make reasonable efforts to market the plate at campus events and through
other outreach channels under the University's control.
SECTION 7. No later than September 1, 2027, North Carolina State University, in
consultation with the Division of Motor Vehicles and the North Carolina Wildlife Resources
Commission, shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the
Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the House
Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal
Research Division on the University's efforts to promote the plate and the number of plates
issued.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation, Division of Motor Vehicles, the sum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to develop the Red Wolf special registration
plate authorized by this act, including plate design, programming, setup, production preparation,
and associated administrative costs for initial implementation.
SECTION 9. There is appropriated from the General Fund to The University of
North Carolina Board of Governors for allocation to North Carolina State University, College of
Veterinary Medicine, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to support the initial promotion and public awareness of the Red Wolf
special registration plate established by this act.
SECTION 10. Sections 8 and 9 of this act become effective July 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 1157-First Edition Page 3